tests/habitual.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "affirmative (long-vowel-final)":
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p1><sg> : барааччыбын
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p2><sg> : барааччыгын
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p3><sg> : барааччы
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p1><pl> : барааччыбыт
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p2><pl> : барааччыгыт
    бараа<v><tv><hab><p3><pl> : барааччылар

  "affirmative (cons-final)":
    бар<v><iv><hab><p1><sg> : барааччыбын
    бар<v><iv><hab><p2><sg> : барааччыгын
    бар<v><iv><hab><p3><sg> : барааччы
    бар<v><iv><hab><p1><pl> : барааччыбыт
    бар<v><iv><hab><p2><pl> : барааччыгыт
    бар<v><iv><hab><p3><pl> : барааччылар

  "affirmative (short-vowel-final)":
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p1><sg> : сылдьааччыбын
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p2><sg> : сылдьааччыгын
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p3><sg> : сылдьааччы
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p1><pl> : сылдьааччыбыт
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p2><pl> : сылдьааччыгыт
    сылдьы<v><iv><hab><p3><pl> : сылдьааччылар

  "affirmative (сиэ)":
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p1><sg> : сиэччибин
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p2><sg> : сиэччигин
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p3><sg> : сиэччи
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p1><pl> : сиэччибит
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p2><pl> : сиэччигит
    сиэ<v><tv><hab><p3><pl> : сиэччилэр

  "affirmative (ыа)":
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p1><sg> : ыаччыбын
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p2><sg> : ыаччыгын
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p3><sg> : ыаччы
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p1><pl> : ыаччыбыт
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p2><pl> : ыаччыгыт
    ыа<v><tv><hab><p3><pl> : ыаччылар

#  "first set of negatives":
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p1><sg> : барааччым суох
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p2><sg> : барааччыҥ суох
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p3><sg> : барааччыта суох
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p1><pl> : барааччыбыт суох
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p2><pl> : барааччыгыт суох
#    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p3><pl> : барааччылара суох

  "second set of negatives":
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p1><sg> : барааччыта суохпун
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p2><sg> : барааччыта суоххун
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p3><sg> : барааччыта суох
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p1><pl> : барааччыта суохпут
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p2><pl> : барааччыта суоххут
    бараа<v><tv><neg><hab><p3><pl> : барааччыта суохтар
